Florida, session 2026, HB1483.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 420.56, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
420.56 Homes for Veterans Property Management Incentive
Pilot Program trust funds.—
(1) The Vacancy Relief Trust Fund and Risk Mitigation
Trust Fund are created within the Florida Housing Finance
Corporation, to which the Legislature may appropriate funds for
the purpose of implementing the Homes for Veterans Property
Management Incentive Pilot Program under s. 83.684.
(2) Notwithstanding s. 216.301 and pursuant to s. 216.351,
any balance in either trust fund at the end of the fiscal year
shall revert and be appropriated to the corporation for the next
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1483-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1483 2026
fiscal year for carrying out the purposes of the trust funds.
(3) In accordance with s. 19(f)(2), Art. III of the State
Constitution, the Vacancy Relief Trust Fund and Risk Mitigation
Trust Fund must, unless terminated sooner, be terminated on July
1, 2030. Before the scheduled termination of the Vacancy Relief
Trust Fund and Risk Mitigation Trust Fund, each trust fund must
be reviewed as provided in s. 215.3206(1) and (2).
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, but
only if HB 1481 or similar legislation is adopted in the same
legislative session or an extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1483-00